Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
Article 9. Penalties.

§ 69-15-331.
General penalty; injunction.

Except as otherwise provided in the particular sections of this chapter, any person, firm or corporation violating any of the provisions of Articles 1, 3, 5 and 7 of this chapter, or any of the rules and regulations of the Board of Animal Health or interfering with any duly appointed officer of said board in the discharge of his duty, or for having discharged his duties, shall be subject to the provisions of Sections 69-15-53 through 69-15-69.

When necessary to effect the purposes of this chapter, in addition to all other remedies in law or equity, the Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce may and is hereby authorized to petition the chancery court for an injunction to prevent any violation of the provisions of this chapter, or the continuance of any such violation or to enforce compliance herewith. The chancery court is hereby vested with authority to entertain jurisdiction on any such petition to determine the cause and to issue such process as may be necessary to accomplish the purposes of this chapter.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1930, § 5435; 1942, § 4858; Laws, 1926, ch. 265; Laws, 1962, ch. 166, § 3; Laws, 1981, ch. 418, § 1; Laws, 1989, ch. 449, § 16, eff from and after passage (approved March 24, 1989).